Arkansas, session 2025, HB1675.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-59-404(a), concerning the inspection
fees for Grade "A" milk and milk products under the Arkansas Grade "A" Milk
Program Act of 1981, is amended to read as follows:
(a) In order to make the Grade “A” Milk and Milk Products Inspection
and Regulation Program self-supporting, the Accounting Division of the
Department of Health shall collect two hundred fifty dollars ($250) on a
monthly an annual basis unless otherwise stated from the following as Grade
“A” milk and milk products inspection fees:
(1) Producers shall pay $.030 per one hundred pounds (100 lbs.)
of Grade “A” milk inspected by the state;
(2) Importers of raw Grade “A” milk produced and inspected in
another state and imported into Arkansas as raw Grade “A” milk shall pay an
inspection fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each sample analyzed by the
laboratory of the Department of Health;
(3) Milk plants shall pay $.030 per one hundred pounds (100
lbs.) of Grade “A” milk processed or distributed;
*CRH217*
03-06-2025 09:44:26 CRH217

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1675
(4) Producer-distributors shall pay $.065 per one hundred pounds
(100 lbs.) of Grade “A” milk produced or sold;
(5) Milk haulers who sample and transport Grade “A” milk in the
state shall pay an annual permit fee of ten dollars ($10.00). The fee shall
be due January 1 of each year;
(6) Distributors of Grade “A” milk processed by plants outside
of Arkansas and sold in the state shall pay $.030 per one hundred pounds (100
lbs.) or a monthly minimum fee of two hundred dollars ($200) per month plus
ten dollars ($10.00) for each sample analyzed by the laboratory of the
department. The larger of the two sums shall be paid during the following
month; and
(7) Single service plants shall pay an annual permit fee of two
hundred dollars ($200). This fee shall not be applied to plants paying a milk
inspection fee. The fee shall be due January 1 of each year.

/s/Womack




















03-06-2025 09:44:26 CRH217